Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2265.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5104YH (3) 91 mb/jh H.F. 2265 Section 1. Section 257.11B, subsection 2, paragraph a, 1 subparagraph (3), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 2 (3) For the school budget years year beginning on or 3 after July 1, 2025, resident pupils eligible to enroll in 4 kindergarten through grade twelve who attend a nonpublic school 5 for the applicable school budget year shall be eligible to 6 receive an education savings account payment. 7 Sec. 2. Section 257.11B, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code 8 2026, is amended by adding the following new subparagraph: 9 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (4) For school budget years beginning 10 on or after July 1, 2026, resident pupils eligible to enroll 11 in kindergarten through grade twelve who attend a nonpublic 12 school for the applicable school budget year shall be eligible 13 to receive an education savings account payment if the pupilâs 14 household has an annual income less than or equal to four 15 hundred percent of the most recently revised poverty income 16 guidelines published by the United States department of health 17 and human services. 18 Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of immediate 19 importance, takes effect upon enactment. 20